Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6106
Consideration.

The plan of conversion required by section 44-6105 shall specify the consideration to the policyholders entitled thereto, which consideration may be in cash, stock, a combination thereof, or such other valuable consideration as the director may approve. The plan of conversion may, subject to the approval of the director, provide that all or any portion of the consideration distributable to policyholders may be held in a trust, the terms of which are subject to the approval of the director, established by the mutual insurer for a period not greater than three years, which period may be extended beyond three years for additional annual periods not to exceed five years in the aggregate, with the approval of the director, pursuant to and subject to limitations set forth in the plan of conversion. Unless otherwise ordered by the director and notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, policyholders are not required to be given preemptive rights.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 46;

Laws 1999, LB 326, § 7.